de: Mit und ohne Luft explosionsfähig, R6
en: Explosive with or without contact with air, R6
cs: Výbušný za přístupu i bez přístupu vzduchu, R6
dk: Eksplosiv ved og uden kontakt med luft, R6
el: Εκρηκτικό σε επαφή ή χωρίς επαφή µε τον αέρα, R6
es: Peligro de explosión\, en contacto o sin contacto con el aire, R6
et: Plahvatusohtlik õhuga kokkupuutel või kokkupuuteta, R6
fi: Räjähtävää sellaisenaan tai ilman kanssa, R6
fr: Danger d'explosion en contact ou sans contact avec l'air, R6
hu: Levegővel érintkezve vagy anélkül is robbanásveszélyes, R6
it: Esplosivo a contatto o senza contatto con l'aria, R6
lt: Gali sprogti ore arba beorėje aplinkoje, R6
lv: Sprādzienbīstams gaisa un bezgaisa vidē, R6
mt: Jista' jisplodi b'kuntatt jew bla kuntatt ma' l-ajra, R6
nl: Ontplofbaar met en zonder lucht, R6
no: Eksplosjonsfarlig ved og uten kontakt med luft, R6
pl: Produkt wybuchowy z dostępem i bez dostępu powietrza, R6
pt: Perigo de explosão com ou sem contacto com o ar, R6
sk: Výbušný pri kontakte alebo bez kontaktu so vzduchom, R6
sl: Eksplozivno na zraku ali brez zraka, R6
sv: Explosivt vid kontakt och utan kontakt med luft, R6

de: Kann die Fortpflanzungsfähigkeit beeinträchtigen, R60
en: May impair fertility, R60
cs: Může poškodit reprodukční schopnost, R60
dk: Kan skade forplantningsevnen, R60
el: Μπορεί να εξασθενίσει τη γονιµότητα, R60
es: Puede perjudicar la fertilidad, R60
et: Võib kahjustada sigivust, R60
fi: Voi heikentää hedelmällisyyttä, R60
fr: Peut altérer la fertilité, R60
hu: A fogamzóképességet vagy nemzőképességet (fertilitást) károsíthatja, R60
it: Può ridurre la fertilità, R60
lt: Kenkia vaisingumui, R60
lv: Var kaitēt reproduktīvajām spējām, R60
mt: Jista' jdgħajjef il-fertilità, R60
nl: Kan de vruchtbaarheid schaden, R60
no: Fare for redusert fruktbarhet, R60
pl: Może upośledzać płodność, R60
pt: Pode comprometer a fertilidade, R60
sk: Môže poškodit’ plodnost’, R60
sl: Lahko škoduje plodnosti, R60
sv: Kan ge nedsatt fortplantningsförmåga, R60

de: Kann das Kind im Mutterleib schädigen, R61
en: May cause harm to the unborn child, R61
cs: Může poškodit plod v těle matky, R61
dk: Kan skade barnet under graviditeten, R61
el: Μπορεί να βλάψει το έµβρυο κατά τη διάρκεια της κύησης, R61
es: Riesgo durante el embarazo de efectos adversos para el feto, R61
et: Võib kahjustada loodet, R61
fi: Vaarallista sikiölle, R61
fr: Risque pendant la grossesse d'effets néfastes pour l'enfant, R61
hu: A születendő gyermekre ártalmas lehet, R61
it: Può danneggiare i bambini non ancora nati, R61
lt: Kenkia negimusiam vaikui, R61
lv: Var kaitēt augļa attīstībai, R61
mt: Jista' jagħmel ħsara lit-tarbija fil-ġuf, R61
nl: Kan het ongeboren kind schaden, R61
no: Fare for fosterskader, R61
pl: Może działać szkodliwie na dziecko w łonie matki, R61
pt: Risco durante a gravidez com efeitos adversos na descendência, R61
sk: Môže spôsobit’ poškodenie nenarodeného diet’at’a, R61
sl: Lahko škoduje nerojenemu otroku, R61
sv: Kan ge fosterskador, R61

de: Kann möglicherweise die Fortpflanzungsfähigkeit beeinträchtigen, R62
en: Possible risk of impaired fertility, R62
cs: Možné nebezpečí poškození reprodukční schopnosti, R62
dk: Mulighed for skade på forplantningsevnen, R62
el: Πιθανός κίνδυνος για εξασθένηση της γονιµότητας, R62
es: Posible riesgo de perjudicar la fertilidad, R62
et: Võimalik sigivuse kahjustamise oht, R62
fi: Voi mahdollisesti heikentää hedelmällisyyttä, R62
fr: Risque possible d'altération de la fertilité, R62
hu: A fogamzóképességre vagy nemzőképességre (fertilitásra) ártalmas lehet, R62
it: Possibile rischio di ridotta fertilità, R62
lt: Gali pakenkti vaisingumui, R62
lv: Iespējams kaitējuma risks reproduktīvajām spējām, R62
mt: Possibiltà ta' riskju ta' fertilità mdgħajjfa, R62
nl: Mogelijk gevaar voor verminderde vruchtbaarheid, R62
no: Fare for redusert fruktbarhet kan ikke utelukkes, R62
pl: Możliwe ryzyko upośledzenia płodności, R62
pt: Possíveis riscos de comprometer a fertilidade, R62
sk: Možné riziko poškodenia plodnosti, R62
sl: Možna nevarnost oslabitve plodnosti, R62
sv: Möjlig risk för nedsatt fortplantningsförmåga, R62

de: Kann das Kind im Mutterleib möglicherweise schädigen, R63
en: Possible risk of harm to the unborn child, R63
cs: Možné nebezpečí poškození plodu v těle matky, R63
dk: Mulighed for skade på barnet under graviditeten, R63
el: Πιθανός κίνδυνος δυσµενών επιδράσεων στο έµβρυο κατά τη διάρ- κεια της κύησης, R63
es: Posible riesgo durante el embarazo de efectos adversos para el feto, R63
et: Võimalik loote kahjustamise oht, R63
fi: Voi olla vaarallista sikiölle, R63
fr: Risque possible pendant la grossesse d'effets néfastes pour l'enfant, R63
hu: A születendő gyermeket károsíthatja, R63
it: Possibile rischio di danni ai bambini non ancora nati, R63
lt: Gali pakenkti negimusiam vaikui, R63
lv: Iespējams kaitējuma risks augļa attīstībai, R63
mt: Possibiltà ta' riskju lit-tarbija fil-ġuf, R63
nl: Mogelijk gevaar voor beschadiging van het ongeboren kind, R63
no: Fare for fosterskader kan ikke utelukkes, R63
pl: Możliwe ryzyko szkodliwego działania na dziecko w łonie matki, R63
pt: Possíveis riscos durante a gravidez com efeitos adversos na descendência, R63
sk: Možné riziko poškodenia nenarodeného diet’at’a, R63
sl: Možna nevarnost škodovanja nerojenemu otroku, R63
sv: Möjlig risk för fosterskador, R63

de: Kann Säuglinge über die Muttermilch schädigen, R64
en: May cause harm to breastfed babies, R64
cs: Může poškodit kojené dítě, R64
dk: Kan skade børn i ammeperioden, R64
el: Μπορεί να βλάψει τα βρέφη που τρέφονται µε µητρικό γάλα, R64
es: Puede perjudicar a los niños alimentados con leche materna, R64
et: Võib olla ohtlik imikule rinnapiima kaudu, R64
fi: Saattaa aiheuttaa haittaa rintaruokinnassa oleville lapsille, R64
fr: Risque possible pour les bébés nourris au lait maternel, R64
hu: A szoptatott újszülöttet és csecsemőt károsíthatja, R64
it: Possibile rischio per i bambini allattati al seno, R64
lt: Kenkia žindomam vaikui, R64
lv: Var kaitēt zīdāmam bērnam, R64
mt: Jista' jikkaġuna ħsara lil trabi qed jitreddgħu, R64
nl: Kan schadelijk zijn via de borstvoeding, R64
no: Kan skade spedbarn gjennom morsmelken, R64
pl: Może oddziaływać szkodliwie na dzieci karmione piersią, R64
pt: Pode causar danos às crianças alimentadas com leite materno, R64
sk: Môže spôsobit’ poškodenie dojčiat, R64
sl: Lahko škoduje zdravju dojenčka preko materinega mleka, R64
sv: Kan skada spädbarn under amnigsperioden, R64

de: Gesundheitsschädlich: kann beim Verschlucken Lungenschäden verursachen, R65
en: Harmful: may cause lung damage if swallowed, R65
cs: Zdraví škodlivý: při požití může vyvolat poškození plic, R65
dk: Farlig: kan give lungeskade ved indtagelse, R65
el: Επιβλαβές: µπορεί να προκαλέσει βλάβη στους πνεύµονες σε περί- πτωση κατάποσης, R65
es: Nocivo: se si ingiere puede causar daño pulmonar, R65
et: Kahjulik: allaneelamisel võib põhjustada kopsukahjustusi, R65
fi: Haitallista: voi aiheuttaa keuhkovaurion nieltäessä, R65
fr: Nocif: peut provoquer une atteinte des poumons en cas d'ingestion, R65
hu: Lenyelve ártalmas\, aspiráció (idegen anyagnak a légutakba beszívása) esetén tüdőkárosodást okozhat, R65
it: Nocivo: può causare danni ai polmoni in caso di ingestione, R65
lt: Kenksminga – prarijus\, gali pakenkti plaučiams, R65
lv: Kaitīgs – norijot var izraisīt plaušu bojājumu, R65
mt: Jagħmel ħsara: jista' jikkaġuna ħsara lill-pulmuni jekk jinbela', R65
nl: Schadelijk: kan longschade veroorzaken na verslikken, R65
no: Helsefarlig\, kan forårsake lungeskader ved svelging, R65
pl: Działa szkodliwie; może powodować uszkodzenie płuc w przypadku połknięcia, R65
pt: Nocivo: pode causar danos nos pulmões se ingerido, R65
sk: Škodlivý \, po požití môže spôsobit’ poškodenie pl’úc, R65
sl: Zdravju škodljivo: pri zaužitju lahko povzroči poškodbo pljuč, R65
sv: Farligt: kan ge lungskador vid förtäring, R65

de: Wiederholter Kontakt kann zu spröder oder rissiger Haut führen, R66
en: Repeated exposure may cause skin dryness or cracking, R66
cs: Opakovaná expozice může způsobit vysušení nebo popraskání kůže, R66
dk: Gentagen udsættelse kan give tør eller revnet hud, R66
el: Παρατεταµένη έκθεση µπορεί να προκαλέσει ξηρότητα δέρµατος ή σκάσιµο, R66
es: La exposicíon repetida puede provocar sequedad o formacíon de grietas en la piel, R66
et: Korduv toime võib põhjustada naha kuivust või lõhenemist, R66
fi: Toistuva altistus voi aiheuttaa ihon kuivumista tai halkeilua, R66
fr: L'exposition répérée peut provoquer dessèchement ou gerçures de la peau, R66
hu: Ismételt expozíció a bőr kiszáradását vagy megrepedezését okozhatja, R66
it: L'esposizione ripetuta può provocare secchezza e screpolature della pelle, R66
lt: Pakartotinas poveikis gali sukelti odos džiūvimą arba skilinė- jimą, R66
lv: Atkārtota iedarbība var radīt sausu ādu vai izraisīt tās sprēgāšanu, R66
mt: Espożizzjoni ripetuta tista' tikkaġuna nxif jew qsim tal-ġilda, R66
nl: Herhaalde blootstelling kan een droge of een gebarsten huid veroorzaken, R66
no: Gjentatt kontakt kan føre til sprø hud eller til revner i huden, R66
pl: Powtarzające się narażenie może powodować wysuszanie lub pękanie skóry, R66
pt: Pode provocar secura da pele ou fissuras\, por exposição repetida, R66
sk: Opakovaná expozícia môže spôsobit’ vysušenie alebo popraskanie pokožky, R66
sl: Ponavljajoča izpostavljenost lahko povzroči nastanek suhe ali Razpokane kože, R66
sv: Upprepad kontakt kan ge torr hud eller hudsprickor, R66

de: Dämpfe können Schläfrigkeit und Benommenheit verursachen, R67
en: Vapours may cause drowsiness and dizziness, R67
cs: Vdechování par může způsobit ospalost a závratě, R67
dk: Dampe kan give sløvhed og svimmelhed, R67
el: H εισπνοή ατµών µπορεί να προκαλέσει υπνηλία και ζάλη, R67
es: La inhalacíon de vapores puede provocar somnolencia y vértigo, R67
et: Aurud võivad põhjustada uimasust ja peapööritust, R67
fi: Höyryt voivat aiheuttaa uneliaisuutta ja huimausta, R67
fr: L'inhalation de vapeurs peut provoquer somnolence et vertiges, R67
hu: A gőzök belégzése álmosságot vagy szédülést okozhat, R67
it: L'inalazione dei vapori può provocare sonnolenza e vertigini, R67
lt: Garai gali sukelti mieguistumą ir galvos svaigimą, R67
lv: Tvaiki var radīt miegainību un reiboni, R67
mt: Ix-xamm tal-fwar jista' jikkaġuna ħedla ta' ngħas u sturdamenti, R67
nl: Dampen kunnen slaperigheid en duizeligheid veroorzaken, R67
no: Dampene kan føre til at man føler seg søvnig eller omtåket, R67
pl: Pary mogą wywoływać uczucie senności i zawroty głowy, R67
pt: Pode provocar sonolência e vertigens\, por inalação dos vapores, R67
sk: Pary môžu spôsobit’ ospalost’ a závrat, R67
sl: Hlapi lahko povzročijo zaspanost in omotico, R67
sv: Ångor kan göra att man blir dåsig och omtöcknad, R67

de: Irreversibler Schaden möglich, R68
en: Possible risk of irreversible effects, R68
cs: Možné nebezpečí nevratných účinků, R68
dk: Mulighed for varig skade på helbred, R68
el: Πιθανοί κίνδυνοι µονίµων επιδράσεων, R68
es: Posibilidad de efectos irreversibles, R68
et: Pöördumatute kahjustuste oht, R68
fi: Pysyvien vaurioiden vaara, R68
fr: Possibilité d'effets irréversibles, R68
hu: Maradandó egészségkárosodást okozhat, R68
it: Possibilità di effetti irreversibili, R68
lt: Gali sukelti negrįžtamus sveikatos pakenkimus, R68
lv: Iespējams neatgriezeniskas iedarbības risks, R68
mt: Riskju possibbli ta' effetti irreversibbli, R68
nl: Onherstelbare effecten zijn niet uitgesloten, R68
no: Fare for uhelbredelig skadevirkning, R68
pl: Możliwe ryzyko powstania nieodwracalnych zmian w stanie zdrowia, R68
pt: Possibilidade de efeitos irreversíveis, R68
sk: Možné riziká ireverzibilných účinkov, R68
sl: Možna nevarnost trajnih okvar zdravja, R68
sv: Möjlig risk för bestående hälsoskador, R68

de: Gesundheitsschädlich: Möglichkeit irreversiblen Schadens durch Einatmen, R68/20
en: Harmful: possible risk of irreversible effects through inhalation, R68/20
cs: Zdraví škodlivý : Možné nebezpečí nevratných účinků při vdechování, R68/20
dk: Farlig: mulighed for varig skade på helbred ved indånding, R68/20
el: Επιβλαβές: πιθανοί κίνδυνοι µονίµων επιδράσεων όταν εισπνέεται, R68/20
es: Nocivo: posibilidad de efectos irreversibles por inhalación, R68/20
et: Kahjulik: võimalik pöördumatute kahjustuste oht sissehingamisel, R68/20
fi: Terveydelle haitallista: pysyvien vaurioiden vaara hengitettynä, R68/20
fr: Nocif: possibilité d'effets irréversibles par inhalation, R68/20
hu: Belélegezve ártalmas: maradandó egészségkárosodást okozhat, R68/20
it: Nocivo: possibilità di effetti irreversibili per inalazione, R68/20
lt: Kenksminga: gali sukelti negrįžtamus sveikatos pakenkimus įkvėpus, R68/20
lv: Kaitīgs – iespējams neatgriezeniskas iedarbības risks ieelpojot, R68/20
mt: Jagħmel ħsara: riskju possibbli ta' effetti irreversibbli minħabba xamm, R68/20
nl: Schadelijk: bij inademing zijn onherstelbare effecten niet uitgesloten, R68/20
no: Helseskadelig: Mulig fare for uhelbredelig skadevirkning ved innånding, R68/20
pl: Działa szkodliwie przez drogi oddechowe; możliwe ryzyko powstania nieodwracalnych zmian w stanie zdrowia, R68/20
pt: Nocivo: possibilidade de efeitos irreversíveis por inalação, R68/20
sk: Škodlivý \, možné riziko ireverzibilných účinkov vdýchnutím, R68/20
sl: Zdravju škodljivo: možna nevarnost trajnih okvar zdravja pri vdihavanju, R68/20
sv: Farligt: möjlig risk för bestående hälsoskador vid inandning, R68/20

de: Gesundheitsschädlich: Möglichkeit irreversiblen Schadens durch Einatmen und bei Berührung mit der Haut, R68/20/21
en: Harmful: possible risk of irreversible effects through inhalation and in contact with skin, R68/20/21
cs: Zdraví škodlivý : Možné nebezpečí nevratných účinků při vdechování a při styku s kůží, R68/20/21
dk: Farlig: mulighed for varig skade på helbred ved indånding og hudkontakt, R68/20/21
el: Επιβλαβές: πιθανοί κίνδυνοι µονίµων επιδράσεων όταν εισπνέεται και σε επαφή µε το δέρµα, R68/20/21
es: Nocivo: posibilidad de efectos irreversibles por inhalación y contactocon la piel, R68/20/21
et: Kahjulik: võimalik pöördumatute kahjustuste oht sissehingamisel ja kokkupuutel nahaga, R68/20/21
fi: Terveydelle haitallista: pysyvien vaurioiden vaara hengitettynä ja joutuessaan iholle, R68/20/21
fr: Nocif: possibilité d'effets irréversibles par inhalation et par contact avec la peau, R68/20/21
hu: Belélegezve és bőrrel érintkezve ártalmas: maradandó egészségkárosodást okozhat, R68/20/21
it: Nocivo: possibilità di effetti irreversibili per inalazione e a contatto con la pelle, R68/20/21
lt: Kenksminga: gali sukelti negrįžtamus sveikatos pakenkimus įkvėpus ir susilietus su oda, R68/20/21
lv: Kaitīgs – iespējams neatgriezeniskas iedarbības risks ieelpojot un nonākot saskarē ar ādu, R68/20/21
mt: Jagħmel ħsara: riskju possibbli ta' effetti irriversibbli minħabba xamm u meta jmiss il-ġilda, R68/20/21
nl: Schadelijk: bij inademing en aanraking met de huid zijn onherstelbare effecten niet uitgesloten, R68/20/21
no: Helseskadelig: Mulig fare for uhelbredelig skadevirkning ved innånding og hudkontakt.  , R68/20/21
pl: Działa szkodliwie przez drogi oddechowe i w kontakcie ze skórą; możliwe ryzyko powstania nieodwracalnych zmian w stanie zdrowia, R68/20/21
pt: Nocivo: possibilidade de efeitos irreversíveis por inalação e em contacto com a pele, R68/20/21
sk: Zdravju škodljivo: možna nevarnost trajnih okvar zdravja pri vdihavanju in v stiku s kožo, R68/20/21
sl: Terveydelle haitallista: pysyvien vaurioiden vaara hengitettynä ja joutuessaan iholle, R68/20/21
sv: Farligt: möjlig risk för bestående hälsoskador vid inandning och hudkontakt, R68/20/21

de: Gesundheitsschädlich: Möglichkeit irreversiblen Schadens durch Einatmen\, Berührung mit der Haut und durch Verschlucken, R68/20/21/22
en: Harmful: possible risk of irreversible effects through inhalation\, in contact with skin and if swallowed, R68/20/21/22
cs: Zdraví škodlivý : Možné nebezpečí nevratných účinků při vdechování\, při styku s kůží a při požití, R68/20/21/22
dk: Farlig: mulighed for varig skade på helbred ved indånding\, hudkontakt og indtagelse, R68/20/21/22
el: Επιβλαβές: πιθανοί κίνδυνοι µονίµων επιδράσεων όταν εισπνέεται\, σε επαφή µε το δέρµα και σε περίπτωση καταπόσεως, R68/20/21/22
es: Nocivo: posibilidad de efectos irreversibles por inhalación\, contacto con la piel e ingestión, R68/20/21/22
et: Kahjulik: võimalik pöördumatute kahjustuste oht sissehingamisel\, kokkupuutel nahaga ja allaneelamisel, R68/20/21/22
fi: Terveydelle haitallista: pysyvien vaurioiden vaara hengitettynä\, joutuessaan iholle ja nieltynä, R68/20/21/22
fr: Nocif: possibilité d'effets irréversibles par inhalation\, par contact avec la peau et par ingestion, R68/20/21/22
hu: Belélegezve\, bőrrel érintkezve és lenyelve ártalmas: maradandó egészségkárosodást okozhat, R68/20/21/22
it: Nocivo: possibilità di effetti irreversibili per inalazione\, a contatto con la pelle e per ingestione, R68/20/21/22
lt: Kenksminga: gali sukelti negrįžtamus sveikatos pakenkimus įkvėpus\, susilietus su oda ir prarijus, R68/20/21/22
lv: Kaitīgs – iespējams neatgriezeniskas iedarbības risks ieelpojot\, nonākot saskarē ar ādu un norijot, R68/20/21/22
mt: Jagħmel ħsara: riskju possibbli ta' effetti irriversibbli minħabba xamm\, meta jmiss il-ġilda u jekk jinbela', R68/20/21/22
nl: Schadelijk: bij inademing\, aanraking met de huid en opname door de mond zijn onherstelbare effecten niet uitgesloten, R68/20/21/22
no: Helseskadelig: Mulig fare for uhelbredelig skadevirkning ved innånding\, hudkontakt og svelging.  , R68/20/21/22
pl: Działa szkodliwie przez drogi oddechowe\, w kontakcie ze skórą i po połknięciu; możliwe ryzyko powstania nieodwracalnych zmian w stanie zdrowia, R68/20/21/22
pt: Nocivo: possibilidade de efeitos irreversíveis por inalação\, em contacto com a pele e por ingestão, R68/20/21/22
sk: Škodlivý \, možné riziko ireverzibilných účinkov vdýchnutím\, pri kontakte s pokožkou a po požití, R68/20/21/22
sl: Zdravju škodljivo: možna nevarnost trajnih okvar zdravja pri vdihavanju\, v stiku s kožo in pri zaužitju, R68/20/21/22
sv: Farligt: möjlig risk för bestående hälsoskador vid inandning\, hudkontakt och förtäring, R68/20/21/22

de: Gesundheitsschädlich: Möglichkeit irreversiblen Schadens durch Einatmen und durch Verschlucken, R68/20/22
en: Harmful: possible risk of irreversible effects through inhalation and if swallowed, R68/20/22
cs: Zdraví škodlivý : Možné nebezpečí nevratných účinků při vdechování a při požití, R68/20/22
dk: Farlig: mulighed for varig skade på helbred ved indånding og indtagelse, R68/20/22
el: Επιβλαβές: πιθανοί κίνδυνοι µονίµων επιδράσεων όταν εισπνέεται και σε περίπτωση καταπόσεως, R68/20/22
es: Nocivo: posibilidad de efectos irreversibles por inhalación e ingestión, R68/20/22
et: Kahjulik: võimalik pöördumatute kahjustuste oht sissehingamisel ja allaneelamisel, R68/20/22
fi: Terveydelle haitallista: pysyvien vaurioiden vaara hengitettynä ja nieltynä, R68/20/22
fr: Nocif: possibilité d'effets irréversibles par inhalation et par ingestion, R68/20/22
hu: Belélegezve és lenyelve ártalmas: maradandó egészségkárosodást okozhat, R68/20/22
it: Nocivo: possibilità di effetti irreversibili per inalazione e ingestione, R68/20/22
lt: Kenksminga: gali sukelti negrįžtamus sveikatos pakenkimus įkvėpus ir prarijus, R68/20/22
lv: Kaitīgs – iespējams neatgriezeniskas iedarbības risks ieelpojot un norijot, R68/20/22
mt: Jagħmel ħsara: riskju possibbli ta' effetti irreversibbli minħabba xamm u jekk jinbela', R68/20/22
nl: Schadelijk: bij inademing en opname door de mond zijn onherstelbare effecten niet uitgesloten, R68/20/22
no: Helseskadelig: Mulig fare for uhelbredelig skadevirkning ved innånding og svelging.   , R68/20/22
pl: Działa szkodliwie przez drogi oddechowe i po połknięciu; możliwe ryzyko powstania nieodwracalnych zmian w stanie zdrowia, R68/20/22
pt: Nocivo: possibilidade de efeitos irreversíveis por inalação e ingestão, R68/20/22
sk: Škodlivý \, možné riziko ireverzibilných účinkov vdýchnutím a po požití, R68/20/22
sl: Zdravju škodljivo: možna nevarnost trajnih okvar zdravja pri vdihavanju in pri zaužitju, R68/20/22
sv: Farligt: möjlig risk för bestående hälsoskador vid inandning och förtäring, R68/20/22

de: Gesundheitsschädlich: Möglichkeit irreversiblen Schadens bei Berührung mit der Haut, R68/21
en: Harmful: possible risk of irreversible effects in contact with skin, R68/21
cs: Zdraví škodlivý : Možné nebezpečí nevratných účinků při styku s kůží, R68/21
dk: Farlig: mulighed for varig skade på helbred ved hudkontakt, R68/21
el: Επιβλαβές: πιθανοί κίνδυνοι µονίµων επιδράσεων σε επαφή µε το δέρµα, R68/21
es: Nocivo: posibilidad de efectos irreversibles por contacto con la piel, R68/21
et: Kahjulik: võimalik pöördumatute kahjustuste oht kokkupuutel nahaga, R68/21
fi: Terveydelle haitallista: pysyvien vaurioiden vaara joutuessaan iholle, R68/21
fr: Nocif: possibilité d'effets irréversibles par contact avec la peau, R68/21
hu: Bőrrel érintkezve ártalmas: maradandó egészségkárosodást okozhat, R68/21
it: Nocivo: possibilità di effetti irreversibili a contatto con la pelle, R68/21
lt: Kenksminga: gali sukelti negrįžtamus sveikatos pakenkimus susilietus su oda, R68/21
lv: Kaitīgs – iespējams neatgriezeniskas iedarbības risks\, nonākot saskarē ar ādu, R68/21
mt: Jagħmel ħsara: riskju possibbli ta' effetti irreversibbli meta jmiss il-ġilda, R68/21
nl: Schadelijk: bij aanraking met de huid zijn onherstelbare effecten niet uitgesloten, R68/21
no: Helseskadelig: Mulig fare for uhelbredelig skadevirkning ved hudkontakt.  , R68/21
pl: Działa szkodliwie w kontakcie ze skórą; możliwe ryzyko powstania nieodwracalnych zmian w stanie zdrowia, R68/21
pt: Nocivo: possibilidade de efeitos irreversíveis em contacto com a pele, R68/21
sk: Škodlivý \, možné riziko ireverzibilných účinkov pri kontakte s pokožkou, R68/21
sl: Zdravju škodljivo: možna nevarnost trajnih okvar zdravja v stiku s kožo, R68/21
sv: Farligt: möjlig risk för bestående hälsoskador vid hufkontakt, R68/21

de: Gesundheitsschädlich: Möglichkeit irreversiblen Schadens bei Berührung mit der Haut und durch Verschlucken, R68/21/22
en: Harmful: possible risk of irreversible effects in contact with skin and if swallowed, R68/21/22
cs: Zdraví škodlivý : Možné nebezpečí nevratných účinků při styku s kůží a při požití, R68/21/22
dk: Farlig: mulighed for varig skade på helbred ved hudkontakt og indtagelse, R68/21/22
el: Επιβλαβές: πιθανοί κίνδυνοι µονίµων επιδράσεων σε επαφή µε το δέρµα και σε περίπτωση καταπόσεως, R68/21/22
es: Nocivo: posibilidad de efectos irreversibles por contacto con la piel e ingestión, R68/21/22
et: Kahjulik: võimalik pöördumatute kahjustuste oht kokkupuutel nahaga ja allaneelamisel, R68/21/22
fi: Terveydelle haitallista: pysyvien vaurioiden vaara joutuessaan iholle ja nieltynä, R68/21/22
fr: Nocif: possibilité d'effets irréversibles par contact avec la peau et par ingestion, R68/21/22
hu: Bőrrel érintkezve és lenyelve ártalmas: maradandó egészségkárosodást okozhat, R68/21/22
it: Nocivo: possibilità di effetti irreversibili a contatto con la pelle e per ingestione, R68/21/22
lt: Kenksminga: gali sukelti negrįžtamus sveikatos pakenkimus susilietus su oda ir prarijus, R68/21/22
lv: Kaitīgs – iespējams neatgriezeniskas iedarbības risks\, nonākot saskarē ar ādu un norijot, R68/21/22
mt: Jagħmel ħsara: riskju possibbli ta' effetti irreversibbli meta jmiss il-ġilda u jekk jinbela', R68/21/22
nl: Schadelijk: bij aanraking met de huid en opname door de mond zijn onherstelbare effecten niet uitgesloten, R68/21/22
no: Helseskadelig: Mulig fare for uhelbredelig skadevirkning ved hudkontakt og svelging, R68/21/22
pl: Działa szkodliwie w kontakcie ze skórą i po połknięciu; możliwe ryzyko powstania nieodwracalnych zmian w stanie zdrowia, R68/21/22
pt: Nocivo: possibilidade de efeitos irreversíveis em contacto com a pele e por ingestão, R68/21/22
sk: Škodlivý \, možné riziko ireverzibilných účinkov pri kontakte s pokožkou a po požití, R68/21/22
sl: Zdravju škodljivo: možna nevarnost trajnih okvar zdravja v stiku s kožo in pri zaužitju, R68/21/22
sv: Farligt: möjlig risk för bestående hälsoskador vid hudkontakt och förtäring, R68/21/22

de: Gesundheitsschädlich: Möglichkeit irreversiblen Schadens durch Verschlucken, R68/22
en: Harmful: possible risk of irreversible effects if swallowed, R68/22
cs: Zdraví škodlivý : Možné nebezpečí nevratných účinků při požití, R68/22
dk: Farlig: mulighed for varig skade på helbred ved indtagelse, R68/22
el: Επιβλαβές: πιθανοί κίνδυνοι µονίµων επιδράσεων σε περίπτωση καταπόσεως, R68/22
es: Nocivo: posibilidad de efectos irreversibles por ingestión, R68/22
et: Kahjulik: võimalik pöördumatute kahjustuste oht allaneelamisel, R68/22
fi: Terveydelle haitallista: pysyvien vaurioiden vaara nieltynä, R68/22
fr: Nocif: possibilité d'effets irréversibles par ingestion, R68/22
hu: Lenyelve ártalmas: maradandó egészségkárosodást okozhat, R68/22
it: Nocivo: possibilità di effetti irreversibili per ingestione, R68/22
lt: Kenksminga: gali sukelti negrįžtamus sveikatos pakenkimus prarijus, R68/22
lv: Kaitīgs – iespējams neatgriezeniskas iedarbības risks norijot, R68/22
mt: Jagħmel ħsara: riskju possibbli ta' effetti irreversibbli jekk jinbela', R68/22
nl: Schadelijk: bij opname door de mond zijn onherstelbare effecten niet uitgesloten, R68/22
no: Helseskadelig: Mulig fare for uhelbredelig skadevirkning ved svelging, R68/22
pl: Działa szkodliwie po połknięciu; możliwe ryzyko powstania nieodwracalnych zmian w stanie zdrowia, R68/22
pt: Nocivo: possibilidade de efeitos irreversíveis por ingestão, R68/22
sk: Škodlivý \, možné riziko ireverzibilných účinkov po požití, R68/22
sl: Zdravju škodljivo: možna nevarnost trajnih okvar zdravja pri zaužitju, R68/22
sv: Farligt: möjlig risk för bestående hälsoskador vid förtäring, R68/22

de: Explosionsgefahr bei Mischung mit brennbaren Stoffen, R9
en: Explosive when mixed with combustible material, R9
cs: Výbušný při smíchání s hořlavým materiálem, R9
dk: Eksplosionsfarlig ved blanding med brandbare stoffer, R9
el: Εκρηκτικό όταν αναµιχθεί µε καύσιµα υλικά, R9
es: Peligro de explosión al mezclar con materias combustibles, R9
et: Plahvatusohtlik segatult süttiva ainega, R9
fi: Räjähtävää sekoitettaessa palavien aineiden kanssa, R9
fr: Peut exploser en mélange avec des matières combustibles, R9
hu: Éghető anyaggal keveredve robbanásveszélyes, R9
it: Esplosivo in miscela con materie combustibili, R9
lt: Gali sprogti sumaišyta su galinčiomis degti medžiagomis, R9
lv: Sprādzienbīstams\, sajaucot ar degošu materiālu, R9
mt: Jisplodi meta jitħallat ma' materjal li jaqbad, R9
nl: Ontploffingsgevaar bij menging met brandbare stoffen, R9
no: Eksplosjonsfarlig ved blanding med brennbare stoffer, R9
pl: Grozi wybuchem po zmieszaniu z materiałem zapalnym, R9
pt: Pode explodir quando misturado com matérias combustíveis, R9
sk: Výbušný po zmiešaní s horl’avým materiálom, R9
sl: Eksplozivno v mešanici z vnetljivim materialom, R9
sv: Explosivt vid blandning med brännbart material, R9

de: Mäßig gesundheitsschädlich (nur Schweden), R322
en: R322
cs: R322
dk: R322
el: R322
es: R322
et: R322
fi: R322
fr: R322
hu: R322
it: R322
lt: R322
lv: R322
mt: R322
nl: R322
no: Måttligt hälsoskadliga, R322
pl: R322
pt: R322
sk: R322
sl: R322
sv: R322

de: Verdacht auf krebserzeugende Wirkung (nur Schweden\, anstatt R40), R340
en: R340
cs: R340
dk: R340
el: R340
es: R340
et: R340
fi: R340
fr: R340
hu: R340
it: R340
lt: R340
lv: R340
mt: R340
nl: R340
no: Cancerframkallande, R340
pl: R340
pt: R340
sk: R340
sl: R340
sv: R340